Illinois, session 104th, SB2609.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. In addition to other sums appropriated, the sum 6of $60,549,700, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is 7appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to the Office of 8Statewide Pretrial Services for operational expenses, awards, 9grants, permanent improvements, and pretrial services 10reimbursements for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 11    Section 10. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof may 12be necessary, is appropriated from the Office of Statewide 13Pretrial Services Special State Projects Fund to the Office of 14Statewide Pretrial Services for expenses relating to various 15State projects. 16    Section 15. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary, is appropriated from the Office of the 18Statewide Pretrial Services Federal Projects Fund to the 19Office of Statewide Pretrial Services for expenses relating to 20various federal projects.   SB2609- 2 -LRB104 12022 RLC 22117 b1    Section 20. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof may be 2necessary, is appropriated from the Office of the Statewide 3Pretrial Services Indirect Cost Fund to the Office of 4Statewide Pretrial Services for various administrative 5expenses. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 72025.